Nebraska, session 109, LB780.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB780 LB780
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) No later than January 1, 2027, and notwithstanding
sections 44-794 and 44-3,131, any health benefit plan delivered, issued
for delivery, renewed, or continued in this state shall provide coverage
for the diagnosis and treatment of an eating disorder. Such coverage
shall include: (a) Medical, psychological, and pharmaceutical care; (b)
nutritional counseling provided by a licensed dietitian or nutritionist;
and (c) services provided at all levels of care, including, but not
limited to, inpatient, residential, partial hospitalization, and
intensive outpatient treatment.
(2) Coverage under this section shall not be limited or denied based
on (a) the covered individual's body weight, body mass index, or physical
appearance or (b) the fact that the covered individual has not previously
completed or failed a lower level of care.
(3) For purposes of sections 1 to 3 of this act:
(a) Eating disorder means a condition as defined in the most recent
edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders;
(b) Health benefit plan means any hospital or medical policy or
certificate, major medical expense insurance policy or certificate, or
health maintenance organization subscriber contract delivered, issued for
delivery, renewed, or continued in this state. Health benefit plan does
not include an accident-only, a specified disease, a hospital indemnity,
a Medicare supplement, a long-term care, or other limited benefit
insurance policy; and
(c) Medically necessary means a health care service or supply that
is consistent with generally accepted standards of care and the clinical
practice guidelines for the treatment of an eating disorder published by
the American Psychiatric Association or another nationally recognized
clinical organization.
Sec. 2. (1) The limitations on construction found in section 44-794
shall not apply to the benefits mandated by section 1 of this act. An
insurer shall not utilize the provisions of section 44-794 relating to
-2-

LB780 LB780
2026 2026
mechanisms designed to limit coverage to impose non-quantitative
treatment limitations on eating disorder benefits that are more stringent
than those applied to medical and surgical benefits.
(2) A utilization review or medical necessity determination relating
to an eating disorder shall be conducted by a provider with specific
expertise in the treatment of eating disorders.
Sec. 3. The Department of Insurance may adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations to carry out sections 1 to 3 of this act.
-3-